Hawaii statutes.
[§11-427] Reserving use of
contributions. A candidate who files the affidavit voluntarily agreeing to
limit expenditures and who receives contributions that in aggregate exceed the
expenditure limit for an election shall reserve use of any contributions that
exceed the limit until after the applicable election. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next